Massachusetts, session 194th, H5520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1: (a) Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, George Patrinos, firefighter in the town of Dudley, may continue to 
serve in that position until he reaches the age of 70; provided, however, that he is mentally and 
physically capable of performing the duties of such position. The select board of the town of 
Dudley may, at its own expense, require George Patrinos to undergo an annual examination by 
an impartial physician designated by the town to determine his capability to remain in service.    
(b) No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of George 
Patrinos under said chapter 32 for any service subsequent to his reaching 65 years of age and, 
upon retirement, George Patrinos shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to 
that which he would have been entitled had he retired at 65 years of age, if any.    
Section 2: This Act shall take effect upon its passage.